Colorado, session 2026A, SB163.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 44-30-507 as
follows:
44-30-507. Delegation of licensing duties.
The commission, at its discretion, may delegate licensing duties
described in this part 5 ARTICLE 30 to the division.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-30-204, amend
(1)(b) as follows:
44-30-204. Investigator - peace officers.
(1) All investigators of the division and their supervisors, including
the director and the executive director, have all the powers of any peace
officer to:
(b) Inspect, examine, investigate, hold, or impound any premises IN
THE STATE where:
(I) Limited gaming or sports betting is conducted;
(II) AN INVESTIGATOR OR SUPERVISOR SUSPECTS THAT UNLICENSED
GAMING OR UNLICENSED SPORTS BETTING IS CONDUCTED;
(III) THERE ARE any devices or equipment designed for or used in
limited gaming or sports betting; and OR
(IV) THERE ARE any books and OR records THAT ARE RELATED in
any way connected with any limited TO gaming or sports betting; activity;
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-30-818, amend (2)
as follows:
44-30-818. Approval of rules for certain games.
(2) A licensee shall not offer poker, blackjack, craps, or roulette, OR
ANY OTHER SUCH GAME, or any variation game of poker, blackjack, craps,
or roulette, OR ANY OTHER SUCH GAME, without prior approval of the game
by the commission, except as specifically authorized in the commission's
rules regarding field trials of new games or technology DIVISION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-30-1703, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion, (1)(a)(II), (2)(a), and (2)(b)(I) as follows:
44-30-1703. Exclusion of certain individuals from participation
in gaming activities and sports betting - duties of division - mechanism
for self-exclusion - confidential records - rules.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-163

(1) (a) On and after January 1, 2023, The division shall operate a
program to:
(II) Exclude from certain sports betting individuals who:
(A) Are prohibited from placing wagers on certain sporting events
pursuant to section 44-30-1502; OR
(B) VOLUNTARILY REQUEST TO BE EXCLUDED FROM SPORTS BETTING
IN THE STATE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) The division shall include in the program described in
subsection (1) of this section mechanisms by which individuals may request
to be excluded from participation in gaming activities in the state, as
described in subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) of this section, OR FROM SPORTS
BETTING IN THE STATE, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II)(B) OF THIS
SECTION. The mechanisms must include the receipt of such requests by the
division in written, electronic, and telephonic form.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the personal
identifying information of the following individuals is confidential and is
not subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part
2 of article 72 of title 24:
(I) Individuals who request to be excluded from participation in
gaming activities OR SPORTS BETTING in the state pursuant to subsection
(2)(a) of this section; and
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 44-32-102 as
follows:
44-32-102. Definitions - rules.
As used in this article 32, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Applicant" means an individual applying A PERSON SUBMITTING
AN APPLICATION for a license, permit, or registration or the renewal of a
license, permit, or registration granted by the division COMMISSION pursuant
to this article 32. EACH BUSINESS OWNER, BUSINESS OFFICER, BUSINESS
DIRECTOR, OR BUSINESS MANAGER APPLYING FOR A BUSINESS LICENSE IS
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-163

CONSIDERED AN APPLICANT.
(2) "BACKGROUND INVESTIGATION" MEANS AN INQUIRY INTO THE
PERSONAL HISTORY, CHARACTER, REPUTATION, ASSOCIATIONS, PERSONAL
AND PROFESSIONAL RECORD, CRIMINAL HISTORY, CIVIL LITIGATION HISTORY,
AND FINANCIAL HISTORY AND ACTIVITIES OF AN APPLICANT TO ESTABLISH
THE APPLICANT'S SUITABILITY TO BECOME A LICENSEE.
(1.5) (3) "Breakage" means the odd cents by which the amount
payable on each dollar wagered in a pari-mutuel pool exceeds a multiple of
ten cents.
(4) "BUSINESS DIRECTOR" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED TO
OVERSEE THE DAILY OPERATIONS OF THE BUSINESS AT THE DIRECTION OF THE
BUSINESS OFFICER. ADDITIONALLY, THIS INDIVIDUAL HAS THE AUTHORITY
TO HIRE AND DISMISS STAFF MEMBERS AND MAKE FINANCIAL DECISIONS ON
BEHALF OF THE BUSINESS.
(5) "BUSINESS LICENSE" MEANS A LICENSE THAT IS ISSUED BY THE
DIVISION AND THAT IS REQUIRED FOR INDIVIDUALS, COMPANIES,
INSTITUTIONS, ASSOCIATIONS, OR CORPORATIONS TO LAWFULLY ENGAGE IN,
OPERATE, OR SUPPORT COMMERCIAL RACING ACTIVITIES. BUSINESS LICENSES
ARE CATEGORIZED AS FOLLOWS:
(a) "MAJOR BUSINESS LICENSE" REFERS TO THE FOLLOWING LICENSES
ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION: ASSOCIATION OFF-TRACK BETTING, AFFILIATED
OFF-TRACK BETTING, AND TOTALISATOR COMPANIES.
(b) "MINOR BUSINESS LICENSE" REFERS TO THE FOLLOWING LICENSES
ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION: CONCESSION OPERATOR, FEED SUPPLIER,
OFF-TRACK BETTING FACILITY, PHOTO FINISH BUSINESS, RACING CLUB,
SATELLITE CORPORATION, TIP SHEET OPERATOR (INDEPENDENT), TRAINING
TRACK, TACK SHOP, AND VIDEO OPERATOR.
(c) "OUT-OF-STATE ADVANCED DEPOSITS WAGERING LICENSE"
REFERS TO A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION TO ANY OUT-OF-STATE
ENTITY THAT ENGAGES WITH THE COLORADO HORSE RACING INDUSTRY FOR
THE PURPOSES OF PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING.
(6) "BUSINESS MANAGER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OVERSEES A
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-163

BUSINESS'S DAILY OPERATIONS BY WORKING WITH AND MANAGING OTHER
STAFF MEMBERS. ADDITIONALLY, THIS INDIVIDUAL HAS THE AUTHORITY TO
HIRE AND DISMISS STAFF MEMBERS AND MAKE FINANCIAL DECISIONS ON
BEHALF OF THE BUSINESS.
(7) "BUSINESS OFFICER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED TO AN
EXECUTIVE POSITION OF A BUSINESS, SUCH AS A CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER,
CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER, CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER, CHIEF TECHNOLOGY
OFFICER, CHIEF MARKETING OFFICER, CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER, CHIEF
HUMAN RESOURCES OFFICER, OR CHIEF COMPLIANCE OFFICER.
(8) "BUSINESS OWNER" MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS MORE THAN
FIVE PERCENT OF A BUSINESS THAT IS APPLYING FOR A BUSINESS LICENSE.
(2) (9) (a) "Class A track" means a track, located within the state of
Colorado, at which a race meet of horses is conducted and that is not a class
B track.
(b) "Class A track" includes a reopening class A track that has not
run a meet within the past three years. Such class A track may begin to
operate as a simulcast facility after the commission has approved its
application for simulcasting and its application for race dates to hold a race
meet within the following twelve months. Applications submitted to the
commission shall MUST include a provision for the establishment of a purse
fund that complies with this article 32 and the rules of the commission.
(3) (10) "Class B track" means a track, located within the state of
Colorado, at which a race meet of horses, consisting of thirty or more race
days, is being conducted or was being conducted during the immediately
preceding twelve months.
(4) (11) "Commission" means the Colorado racing commission
created in part 3 of this article 32.
(5) Repealed.
(6) (12) "Director" means the director of the division of racing
events.
(7) (13) "Division" means the division of racing events created in
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-163

part 2 of this article 32.
(8) (14) "Horse track" means either a class A track or a class B
track.
(9) (15) "Host track" means either an in-state host track or an
out-of-state host track.
(10) (16) "In-state host track" means a track, located within the state
of Colorado, at which a race meet of horses is conducted.
(11) (17) (a) "In-state simulcast facility" means:
(I) A class A or class B horse track at which a licensee has held
within the preceding twelve months or is licensed and scheduled to hold
within the following twelve months a race meet of at least the duration
required of a class A or class B track for the purpose of handling
pari-mutuel wagers as authorized by this article 32; or
(II) An additional facility that is operated by and is the responsibility
of the licensee of a class B horse track, located in Colorado, and used for
the handling of wagers placed on simulcast races received by the track or
facility. The number of additional facilities cannot exceed the total number
of facilities licensed to hold a race meet in 2003 plus one additional facility
per licensee as authorized under this article 32.
(b) If an additional facility is jointly owned or operated as a
simulcast facility by two or more licensees, the additional facility shall be
IS deemed to be one of the additional simulcast facilities of only one of the
licensees, as designated in writing to the commission.
(c) The commission, for good cause, may grant a licensed class A
horse track permission to receive simulcast races at an alternate location
within five miles of its track during the times when the track is not in
operation.
(12) (18) "Interstate common pool" means a pari-mutuel pool
established at one location, usually but not necessarily at a host track, within
which pool are combined comparable pari-mutuel pools of one or more
simulcast facilities upon a race run at the host track for purposes of
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-163

establishing payoff prices in the various states. There may be simulcast
facilities in more than one state simultaneously combining pari-mutuel
pools into the common pool of the host track. Where permitted by the laws
and rules of the states in which the host track and the simulcast facilities are
located and with the concurrence of the host track, the combined
pari-mutuel pool may be established on a regional or other basis between
two or more simulcast facilities and need not involve a merger into the host
track's pari-mutuel pool. In such instances, one of the simulcast facilities
shall serve as if it were the host track for the purposes of holding the
common pool and calculating payoffs. The interstate common pool shall be
as specified in the written simulcast racing agreement between the host
track and the person operating the simulcast facility receiving the simulcast
races.
(13) (19) "Intrastate common pool" means a pari-mutuel pool,
established for an in-state host track, that includes wagers made at the
in-state host track as well as wagers made at in-state simulcast facilities on
simulcast races of live races run at the in-state host track.
(13.3) (20) "Key occupational license" means a license THAT IS
issued by the division AND THAT IS required for an individual who exercises
significant influence over decisions affecting a business DECISION-MAKING,
MANAGEMENT, OR FINANCIAL INFLUENCE OVER A BUSINESS THAT IS licensed
with the commission pursuant to section 44-32-504. A "KEY OCCUPATIONAL
LICENSE" IS REQUIRED FOR THE FOLLOWING LICENSED POSITIONS: GENERAL
MANAGER, ASSISTANT GENERAL MANAGER, ASSOCIATION VETERINARIAN,
DIRECTOR OF RACING, RACING SECRETARY, CORPORATE DIRECTOR, SECURITY
DIRECTOR, ASSOCIATION STEWARD, CORPORATE OFFICER, MUTUEL
MANAGER, AND TOTALISATOR OPERATOR.
(13.7) (21) "License" means a license granted by the division
pursuant to this article 32.
(14) (22) (a) "Licensee" means:
(I) any A person holding a current, valid race meet license issued
pursuant to section 44-32-505; and
(II) any A person holding a current, valid license or registration
issued by the commission pursuant to sections 44-32-503 and 44-32-504;
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-163

AND
(III) AN EMPLOYEE, AN AGENT, OR A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PERSON
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (22)(a)(I) OR (22)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) The commission, by rule, shall determine which occupational
categories shall be licensed and which shall be registered. Except in
connection with the licensing of race meets, the term "license" includes a
registration and "applicant" includes an applicant for a registration.
(15) (23) "Out-of-state host track" means a track, located within a
state other than Colorado, that is licensed or otherwise properly authorized
under the laws of the state to conduct live races of horses and to broadcast
the races as simulcast races and that broadcasts the simulcast races to an
in-state simulcast facility.
(16) (24) "Out-of-state simulcast facility" means a track or other
facility, located within a jurisdiction other than Colorado, at which
pari-mutuel wagers are placed or accepted, either in person or
electronically, on simulcast races pursuant to proper authorization under the
laws of the jurisdiction.
(17) (25) "Pari-mutuel pool" means a wagering pool into which
pari-mutuel wagers on a live race or on a simulcast race are taken.
(18) (26) "Pari-mutuel wagering" means a form of wagering on the
outcome of horse races in which those who wager purchase tickets of
various denominations on one or more horses from one or more pools and
all like wagers from each race are pooled and the winning ticket holders are
paid prizes from the pool in amounts proportional to the total receipts in the
pool minus deductions authorized by statute.
(19) (27) "Person" means any AN individual, A partnership, A firm,
A corporation, or AN association.
(20) (28) (a) "Race meet", OR "MEET", means any A live exhibition
of racing involving horses registered within their breed, conducted at a track
located within the state of Colorado and operated by a licensee under a
license granted pursuant to section 44-32-505, where the pari-mutuel system
of wagering is used.
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-163

(b) "RACE MEET" OR "MEET" INCLUDES THE TOTAL, CONTINUOUS
PERIOD DURING WHICH A RACING ASSOCIATION OR TRACK PREMISES IS
UNDER THE FULL REGULATORY JURISDICTION OF THE DIVISION, WHICH
PERIOD ENCOMPASSES:
(I) THE LIVE RACING PERIOD, WHICH IS ALL LICENSED DAYS
APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION FOR THE CONDUCT OF LIVE, COMPETITIVE
HORSE RACING;
(II) THE PREMEET REGULATORY PERIOD, WHICH IS THE ENTIRE
PERIOD COMMENCING ON THE FIRST DAY THE LICENSED TRACK PREMISES ARE
MADE AVAILABLE FOR OR UTILIZED FOR RECEIVING HORSES, CONDUCTING
OFFICIAL REGULATED TRAINING, OR PERFORMING OFFICIAL PREMEET
REGULATORY INSPECTIONS, WHICHEVER OCCURS EARLIEST; AND
(III) THE POST-MEET REGULATORY PERIOD, WHICH IS SEVEN
CALENDAR DAYS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING AND INCLUDING THE FINAL
LICENSED DAY OF LIVE RACING CONDUCTED BY A RACING ASSOCIATION FOR
THE CALENDAR YEAR.
(29) "REGISTRATION OCCUPATIONAL LICENSE" MEANS A LICENSE
THAT IS ISSUED BY THE DIVISION TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS SHORT-TERM
COMMITMENTS TO PERFORM SERVICES FOR A TRACK OR RACE MEET. A
"REGISTRATION OCCUPATIONAL LICENSE" IS VALID FOR NO LONGER THAN
NINETY DAYS AND IS REQUIRED BY THE FOLLOWING TEMPORARY LICENSED
POSITIONS: ANNOUNCER, CONCESSION EMPLOYEE, NURSE OR EMERGENCY
MEDICAL TECHNICIAN, OFFICE PERSONNEL, RACING CLUB ASSOCIATION,
TRACK SHOP EMPLOYEE, TEMPORARY TOTE OPERATOR, TEMPORARY TOTE
TECHNICIAN, USER, AND VIDEO TECHNICIAN.
(21) (30) "Simulcast facility" means either an in-state simulcast
facility or an out-of-state simulcast facility.
(22) (31) "Simulcast race" means a live, audio-visual broadcast that
is:
(a) Transmitted simultaneously with either:
(I) The performance of a live race of horses by an out-of-state host
track; or
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-163

(II) The performance of a live race of horses by an in-state host
track; and
(b) Received by a simulcast facility.
(23) (32) "Source market fee" means a licensing fee, assessed by the
director pursuant to section 44-32-202 (3)(h), in lieu of taxes and fees
otherwise payable under this article 32, payable by persons outside of
Colorado who conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast races and who
accept wagers from Colorado residents at out-of-state simulcast facilities.
(23.5) (33) "Support occupational license" means a license THAT IS
issued by the division AND required for an individual regulated by the
division who is not subject to a key occupational license or an occupational
registration license. A "SUPPORT OCCUPATIONAL LICENSE" IS REQUIRED BY
THE FOLLOWING LICENSED POSITIONS: ANIMAL TATTOOER, ASSISTANT
RACING SECRETARY, AUTHORIZED AGENT, CLERK OF SCALES, CLOCKER,
CORPORATE AGENT, DIRECTOR OF SIMULCASTING, EXERCISE RIDER, GROOM,
BOOKKEEPER, HORSE IDENTIFIER, JOCKEY, APPRENTICE JOCKEY, JOCKEY
AGENT, JOCKEY VALET, MAINTENANCE, MONEY ROOM MANAGER, ASSISTANT
MUTUEL MANAGER, MUTUEL EMPLOYEE, FACILITY OFF-TRACK BETTING
MANAGER, OFF-TRACK BETTING MANAGER, ASSISTANT OFF-TRACK BETTING
MANAGER, OUTRIDER, OWNER, VIDEO OPERATOR, OWNER/ASSISTANT
TRAINER, OWNER/TRAINER, ASSISTANT TRAINER, PADDOCK JUDGE, PHOTO
OPERATOR, PLACING JUDGE, PLANT OR TRACK SUPERINTENDENT, PLATER,
PONY PERSON, PRIVATE VETERINARIAN, RESTAURANT EMPLOYEE, SECURITY
GUARD, STABLE SUPERVISOR, STARTER, ASSISTANT STARTER, TOTALISATOR
TECHNICIAN, TRACK SUPERVISOR, TRAINER, AND ANY SIMILAR ROLES OR
LICENSE TYPES THAT ARE NOT SUBJECT TO A KEY OCCUPATIONAL LICENSE OR
AN OCCUPATIONAL REGISTRATION LICENSE.
(24) (34) "Track" or "racetrack" means a track that is located within
the state of Colorado and at which a race meet of horses is conducted under
a license granted pursuant to section 44-32-505.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 16-2.5-123 as
follows:
16-2.5-123. Director of the division of gaming - gaming
investigator.
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-163

The director of the division of gaming in the department of revenue,
THE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE, or a gaming investigator in the department of
revenue is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her
THEIR duties whose primary authority shall be IS as stated in section
44-30-204 OR 44-32-203 (1) and shall also include INCLUDES the
enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified
by the P.O.S.T. board.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-40-301, amend (8)
as follows:
8-40-301. Scope of term "employee" - definition.
(8) For the purposes of articles 40 to 47 of this title 8, "employee"
excludes any person who performs services for more than one employer at
a race meet as defined by section 44-32-102 (20) IN SECTION 44-32-102 (28)
or at a horse track as defined by section 44-32-102 (8) SECTION 44-32-102
(14).
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-2-104, amend
(2)(a)(II) introductory portion, (2)(a)(II)(A), and (2)(h)(I)(A) as follows:
26-2-104. Public assistance programs - automatic enrollment -
electronic benefits transfer service - joint reports with department of
revenue - signs - rules - definitions.
(2) (a) (II) Only those businesses that offer products or services
related to the purpose of the public assistance benefits are allowed to MAY
participate in the electronic benefits transfer service through the use of
point-of-sale terminals. Clients shall not be allowed to access cash benefits
through the electronic benefits transfer service from automated teller
machines in this state located in:
(A) Licensed gaming establishments as defined in section 44-30-103
(18), in-state simulcast facilities as defined in section 44-32-102 (11)
SECTION 44-32-102 (17), tracks for racing as defined in section 44-32-102
(24) SECTION 44-32-102 (34), or commercial bingo facilities as defined in
section 24-21-602 (11);
(h) (I) On or before January 1, 2016, the department of revenue shall
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-163

adopt rules pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4
of title 24, that relate to a client's use of automated teller machines at
locations where the use is prohibited. The rules must apply to the following
establishments:
(A) Licensed gaming establishments as defined in section 44-30-103
(18), in-state simulcast facilities as defined in section 44-32-102 (11)
SECTION 44-32-102 (17), and tracks for racing as defined in section
44-32-102 (24) SECTION 44-32-102 (34);
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 38-13-218 as
follows:
38-13-218. Property held by racetracks - inapplicability.
This article 13 does not apply to any intangible unclaimed property
held by a racetrack, as defined in section 44-32-102 (24) SECTION 44-32-102
(34).
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-30-1609, amend
(2) as follows:
44-30-1609. Authorization to conduct fantasy contests.
(2) Fantasy contests are authorized and may be conducted by a
fantasy contest operator at a licensed facility at which pari-mutuel wagering,
as defined in section 44-32-102 (18) SECTION 44-32-102 (26), may occur.
An operator of a class B track, as defined in section 44-32-102 (3) SECTION
44-32-102 (10), may conduct fantasy contests if the operator is licensed as
a fantasy contest operator.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-32-202, amend
(3)(h)(II) as follows:
44-32-202. Director - qualifications - powers and duties - rules.
(3) The director, as administrative head of the division, shall direct
and supervise all administrative and technical activities of the division. In
addition to the duties imposed upon the director elsewhere in this article 32,
it shall be the director's duty:
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-163

(h) (II) In establishing and adjusting the source market fee defined
in section 44-32-102 (23) SECTION 44-32-102 (32), the director may allocate
a portion of the fee to be credited to any horse purse trust account
established in accordance with section 44-32-702 (1)(f) if the director
determines that such an allocation is necessary to maintain a sufficient and
competitive purse structure. The total fee paid under this section must not
exceed the limit set forth in section 44-32-501 (2)(d).
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-32-501, amend
(3.5) as follows:
44-32-501. Regulation of race meets and racing-related
businesses - additional facilities - rules.
(3.5) An additional facility, as described in section 44-32-102
(11)(a)(II) SECTION 44-32-102 (17)(a)(II), must not be located within fifty
miles of any class B horse track operated by another licensee without the
written consent of the other licensee. The commission shall establish by rule
the means of obtaining the consent.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-32-603, amend (1)
as follows:
44-32-603. Duration of meets.
(1) It is unlawful to conduct any race meet at which wagering is
permitted except under the provisions of this article 32. It is lawful to
conduct pari-mutuel wagering on live horse races that are part of a race
meet licensed and conducted under this article 32. The duration of a horse
race meet at a class B track is as specified in section 44-32-102 (3) SECTION
44-32-102 (10); except that the commission may prescribe a lesser number
of race days in the event of unforeseen circumstances or acts of God.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-33-103, amend (1)
as follows:
44-33-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 33, unless the context otherwise requires:
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-163

(1) "Licensee" means a licensee as defined in section 44-32-102 (14)
SECTION 44-30-501 (22), an operator or retail gaming licensee under section
44-30-501 (1)(b) or (1)(c), an internet sports betting operator as defined in
section 44-30-1501 (5), or a sports betting operator as defined in section
44-30-1501 (11).
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-32-503, amend
(4)(a) as follows:
44-32-503. Rules of commission - licensing - record check.
(4) (a) With the submission of an application for a key occupational
license, or a support occupational license, A MAJOR BUSINESS LICENSE, A
MINOR BUSINESS LICENSE, OR AN OUT-OF-STATE ADVANCED DEPOSITS
WAGERING LICENSE granted pursuant to this article 32, each applicant shall
submit a set of fingerprints to the commission. The commission shall submit
the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of
conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record
check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the
federal bureau of investigation. Only the actual costs of the record check
must be borne by the applicant. Nothing in this subsection (4) precludes the
commission from making further inquiries into the background of the
applicant. THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE THE APPLICANT'S FINGERPRINTS
TO BE TAKEN BY A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, THE DIVISION OF
RACING EVENTS, OR ANY THIRD PARTY APPROVED BY THE COLORADO
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF OBTAINING A
FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK. THE COMMISSION
SHALL AUTHORIZE THE ENTITY TAKING THE APPLICANT'S FINGERPRINTS TO
SUBMIT, AND THE ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT, THE COMPLETE SET OF THE
APPLICANT'S FINGERPRINTS TO THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION.
THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION, ACTING AS THE STATE
IDENTIFICATION BUREAU, SHALL FORWARD THE FINGERPRINTS TO THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING A
NATIONAL FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK TO
ENSURE APPLICANT ELIGIBILITY, PROTECT PUBLIC SAFETY, AND MAINTAIN
THE INTEGRITY OF LICENSED PROFESSIONS. UPON COMPLETION OF THE
NATIONAL FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK, THE
COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION SHALL RETURN THE RESULTS OF ITS
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK TO THE COMMISSION, AND THE
COMMISSION IS THE DESIGNATED GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY AUTHORIZED TO
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-163

RECEIVE AND SCREEN THE RESULTS OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION'S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK TO DETERMINE THE
APPLICANT'S SUITABILITY FOR EMPLOYMENT OR LICENSING. THE APPLICANT
IS RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYING THE COST OF THE RECORD CHECK. NOTHING IN
THIS SUBSECTION (4) PRECLUDES THE COMMISSION FROM MAKING FURTHER
INQUIRIES INTO THE BACKGROUND OF AN APPLICANT.
SECTION 16. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-163

and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-163